Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-148
Materiel administrator; salary.

The compensation of the head of the materiel division, who shall be designated as the materiel administrator, shall be fixed by the Director of Administrative Services subject to availability of appropriations.

Laws 1943, c. 215, § 4, p. 705;

R.S.1943, § 81-148;

Laws 1945, c. 223, § 2, p. 668;

Laws 1951, c. 338, § 6, p. 1118;

Laws 1957, c. 368, § 2, p. 1294;

Laws 1963, c. 508, § 3, p. 1616;

Laws 1967, c. 612, § 2, p. 2059;

Laws 1969, c. 780, § 2, p. 2955.